Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-345
Participation; age limitation.

(1) No person under eighteen years of age shall play or participate in any way in any lottery by the sale of pickle cards.

(2) No person or licensee, or employee or agent thereof, shall knowingly permit an individual under eighteen years of age to play or participate in any way in any lottery by the sale of pickle cards conducted pursuant to the Nebraska Pickle Card Lottery Act.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 111;

Laws 1997, LB 248, § 17.